en: Milk Frothers & Steamers
xx: Milk Frothers & Steamers
cs: Automatické a parní pěniče mléka
da: Mælkeskummere
de: Milchaufschäumer
es: Máquinas de hacer espuma de leche
fr: Émulsionneurs et mousseurs à lait
it: Schiumatori e steamer per latte
ja: ミルクフォーマー
nl: Melkkloppers en -opschuimers
no: Melkeskummere og -dampere
pl: Spieniacze do mleka
pt: Batedores e aquecedores de leite
ru: Устройства для взбивания и подогревания молока
sv: Mjölkskummare och mjölkångare
tr: Süt Köpürtücüler ve Buharlaştırıcılar

en: Mochi Makers
xx: Mochi Makers
cs: Strojky na moči
da: Riskagemaskiner
de: Mochi-Maschinen
es: Máquinas para hacer mochi
fr: Machines à mochi
it: Macchine per mochi
ja: 餅つき機
nl: Mochimachines
no: Mochi-maskiner
pl: Maszynki do mochi
pt: Máquina de bolinhos de arroz japoneses (moti)
ru: Машины для выпекания рисовых кексов
sv: Mockamaskiner
tr: Mochi Makineleri

en: Outdoor Grills
xx: Outdoor Grills
cs: Zahradní grily
da: Udendørsgrill
de: Außengrills
es: Barbacoas
fr: Grils d'extérieur
it: Griglie per esterni
ja: バーベキューグリル
nl: Buitengrills
no: Utendørsgriller
pl: Grille na zewnątrz
pt: Churrasqueiras externas
ru: Уличные грили
sv: Utomhusgrillar
tr: Bahçe Izgaraları

en: Ovens
xx: Ovens
cs: Trouby
da: Ovne
de: Backöfen
es: Hornos
fr: Fours
it: Forni
ja: オーブン
nl: Ovens
no: Ovner
pl: Piekarniki
pt: Fornos
ru: Печи
sv: Ugnar
tr: Fırınlar

en: Electric oven
fr: Four électrique

en: Pasta Makers
xx: Pasta Makers
cs: Mlýnky na těstoviny
da: Pastamaskiner
de: Nudelmaschinen
es: Máquinas para hacer pasta
fr: Machines à pâtes
it: Macchine pasta
ja: パスタメーカー
nl: Pastamakers
no: Pastamaskiner
pl: Maszynki do makaronu
pt: Máquinas de massa
ru: Лапшерезки
sv: Pastamaskiner
tr: Makarna Yapma Makineleri

en: Popcorn Makers
xx: Popcorn Makers
cs: Stroje na výrobu popcornu
da: Popcornmaskiner
de: Popcornmaschinen
es: Máquinas de palomitas
fr: Machines à popcorn
it: Macchine popcorn
ja: ポップコーンメーカー
nl: Popcornmakers
no: Popkornmaskiner
pl: Maszynki do popcornu
pt: Pipoqueiras
ru: Машины для приготовления попкорна
sv: Popcornmaskiner
tr: Mısır Patlatma Makineleri

en: Portable Cooking Stoves
xx: Portable Cooking Stoves
cs: Kempinkové trouby
da: Kogeblus
de: Campingkocher
es: Cocinas de camping
fr: Fours de camping
it: Fornellini da campeggio
ja: 携帯用コンロ
nl: Kampeerkooktoestellen
no: Bærbare komfyrer
pl: Kuchenki przenośne
pt: Fogões para camping
ru: Походные плитки
sv: Portabla spisar
tr: Portatif Fırınlı Ocak

en: Range Hoods
xx: Range Hoods
cs: Digestoře
da: Emhætter
de: Abzugshauben
es: Extractores
fr: Hottes aspirantes, Hotte
it: Cappe da cucina
ja: レンジフード
nl: Afzuigkappen
no: Komfyravtrekk
pl: Okapy kuchenne
pt: Tampas para fogão
ru: Вытяжки
sv: Köksfläktar
tr: Davlumbazlar

en: Ranges
xx: Ranges
cs: Sporáky
da: Komfurer
de: Küchenherde
es: Hornillas
fr: Cuisinières, Cuisinière électrique, Gazinière
it: Fornelli
ja: レンジ
nl: Fornuizen
no: Komfyrer
pl: Kuchenki
pt: Fogões
ru: Кухонные плиты
sv: Köksspisar
tr: Mutfak Ocakları

en: Refrigerators
xx: Refrigerators
cs: Chladničky
da: Køleskabe, Køleskab
de: Kühlschränke
es: Frigoríficos
fr: Réfrigérateurs, Réfrigérateur, Frigo, Frigidaire, Gros appareil électroménager (froid), Gros électroménager réfrigérant
it: Frigoriferi
ja: 冷蔵庫
nl: Koelkasten
no: Kjøleskap
pl: Lodówki
pt: Geladeiras
ru: Холодильники
sv: Kylskåp
tr: Buzdolapları

en: Roaster Ovens & Rotisseries
xx: Roaster Ovens & Rotisseries
cs: Pečicí trouby a grily
da: Stegeovne og rotisserier
de: Grillöfen & Mini-Backöfen
es: Asadores y hornos para asar
fr: Rôtissoires
it: Tegami arrosto/girarrosto
ja: ロースター
nl: Grillovens en spitten
no: Stekeovner og spiddgrillere
pl: Piekarniki i rożna do drobiu
pt: Fornos com grelhas e churrasqueiras
ru: Ростеры и грили
sv: Grillugnar och ugnar med roterande stekspett
tr: Rosto Tencereleri ve Döner Tepsili Fırınlar

en: Soda Makers
xx: Soda Makers
cs: Sodovkovače
da: Sodavandsmaskiner
de: Wassersprudler
es: Máquinas para hacer leche de soja
fr: Machines à gazéifier
it: Soda maker
ja: ソーダメーカー
nl: Frisdrankapparaten
no: Brusmaskiner
pl: Syfony do napojów
pt: Máquinas de fazer refrigerante
ru: Сатураторы
sv: Sodamaskiner
tr: Soda Makineleri

en: Soy Milk Makers
xx: Soy Milk Makers
cs: Přístroje na výrobu sojového mléka
da: Sojamælkmaskiner
de: Sojamilchbereiter
es: Máquinas para leche de soja
fr: Machines à lait de soja
it: Macchine per fare latte di soia
ja: 豆乳メーカー
nl: Makers van sojamelk
no: Soyamelkapparater
pl: Maszynki do mleka sojowego
pt: Máquinas para fazer leite de soja
ru: Устройства для приготовления соевого молока
sv: Sojamjölkmaskiner
tr: Soya Sütü Yapma Makineleri

en: Tea Makers
xx: Tea Makers
cs: Čajovary
da: Temaskiner
de: Teekocher
es: Teteras eléctricas
fr: Machines à thé
it: Bollitori per il tè
ja: ティーメーカー
nl: Theezetapparaten
no: Temaskiner
pl: Automaty do herbaty
pt: Bules
ru: Чаеварки
sv: Tebryggare
tr: Çay Makineleri

en: Toasters & Grills
xx: Toasters & Grills
cs: Topinkovače a grily
da: Brødristere og bordgriller
de: Toaster & Grills
es: Tostadores y parrillas
fr: Grils électriques et grille-pains, Grill
it: Tostapane e griglie
ja: トースター・グリル
nl: Broodroosters en tosti-apparaten
no: Brødristere og griller
pl: Tostery i grille
pt: Torradeiras e grelhas
ru: Тостеры и грили
sv: Brödrostar och brödgrillar
tr: Tost Makineleri ve Izgaralar

en: Countertop & Toaster Ovens
xx: Countertop & Toaster Ovens
cs: Opékací trouby
da: Toastmaskiner
de: Mini- & Toastöfen
es: Hornos tostadores
fr: Mini fours
it: Fornetti e scaldavivande
ja: オーブントースター
nl: Toaster ovens
no: Hybelkomfyrer og grillovner
pl: Opiekacze
pt: Fornos tostadores
ru: Печи-тостеры
sv: Brödrostar och rostugnar
tr: Set Üstü ve Ekmek Kızartıcı Fırınlar

en: Donut Makers
xx: Donut Makers
cs: Přístroj na přípravu koblih
da: Donutmaskiner
de: Donutmaker
es: Máquinas de donuts
fr: Machines à donuts
it: Macchine per donut
ja: ドーナツメーカー
nl: Donutmachines
no: Smultringstekere
pl: Maszynki do pączków
pt: Máquinas de donuts
ru: Печки для пончиков
sv: Munkmaskiner
tr: Donut Makineleri

en: Muffin & Cupcake Makers
xx: Muffin & Cupcake Makers
cs: Přístroje na výrobu muffinů a koláčků
da: Muffin- og cupcakemaskiner
de: Muffin- & Cupcake-Maker
es: Máquinas para hacer magdalenas
fr: Machines à muffins et cupcakes
it: Piastre per muffin e tortine
ja: カップケーキメーカー
nl: Muffin- en cupcake-apparaten
no: Muffins- og cupcake-jern
pl: Maszynki do muffinów i babeczek
pt: Máquinas para fazer muffins e cupcakes
ru: Устройства для выпекания кексов и маффинов
sv: Muffinsmaskiner
tr: Mafin ve Fincan Keki Makineleri

en: Pizza Makers & Ovens
xx: Pizza Makers & Ovens
cs: Domácí pece na pizzu
da: Pizzaovne
de: Pizzaöfen
es: Aparatos para hacer pizza
fr: Machines à pizza
it: Tegami per pizza
ja: ピザメーカー・ピザオーブン
nl: Pizzamakers
no: Pizzastekere og pizzaovner
pl: Piecyki i piece do pizzy
pt: Máquinas de pizza
ru: Печки и печи для пиццы
sv: Pizzamaskiner och pizzaugnar
tr: Pizza Yapma Aletleri ve Fırınlar